Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-3130
Program administration; community
support specialists; duties; training required.

(1) Community support specialists within
the Department of Health and Human Services shall:

(a) Act as
a liaison between the department and community-based organizations;

(b) Facilitate
client assistance by community-based organizations;

(c) Train community-based
organizations in how to help clients access economic assistance programs through
the department web site; and

(d) Respond to client problems with the
application process known as Access Nebraska or its successor.

(2) The department
shall determine the appropriate numbers and hours of community support specialists
but shall, at a minimum, employ eight community support specialists to perform
the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. The community support
specialists shall receive annual training in:

(a) Principles and practices
of public administration;

(b) Procedure and policy development; and

(c) Federal and state laws,
rules, regulations, and procedures pertaining to health and human services
programs.

Laws 2012, LB825, § 4.
July 19, 2012